Louisiana, session 2026, HB458.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:711 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§711. Work release program
A. The Louisiana Legislature hereby authorizes the establishment and
administration of work release programs for the purpose of aiding the transition of
an inmate from confinement to release by re-acclimating him to society, acquiring
work history and job skills, and allowing for financial savings and educational
opportunities.
B. The sheriff of each parish, and in Orleans Parish, the criminal sheriff, is
hereby authorized to may establish and administer a work release program for
inmates of any jail or prison under his jurisdiction. In the event that the inmate is
confined to a parish correctional facility not operated by the sheriff, then the
superintendent of the correctional facility is hereby authorized to may establish and
administer a work release program for inmates of the correctional facility under his
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-891 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 458
jurisdiction, and where the word "sheriff" is used herein it shall also mean in this
Section, the term also means the superintendent of the correctional facility wherein
where the inmate is confined.
B. C. Each sheriff shall establish written rules for the administration of the
work release program and shall determine those inmates who may participate in the
release program, except that no inmate may participate in the program if his sentence
so stipulates. Inmates sentenced to the Department of Corrections who are in the
custody of the sheriff shall not be eligible for work release unless such inmates are
in compliance with standards for work release within the department and written
approval of the secretary of the department is obtained. If any inmate violates the
conditions prescribed by the sheriff, his work release privileges may be withdrawn.
Failure to report to or return from the planned employment shall be considered an
escape under the provisions of R.S. 14:110. The sheriff may approve as work release
privileges, placement in universities, colleges, technical, vocational or trade schools
or in sheltered workshops or supported employment providers as defined in R.S.
39:1604.4, or in training programs designed to improve the skills and abilities of the
inmate.
C. Every D.(1) Subject to the restrictions provided in Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, every inmate with who participates in a work release privileges shall be
liable for the program may be assessed a reasonable cost of his for room, and board,
clothing and other necessary expenses incident to his employment or placement.
(2) The total amount assessed for room and board shall not exceed
thirty-three percent of the inmate’s gross wages that are earned through a work
release program. No additional per diem or related charge shall be imposed beyond
the amount provided in this Paragraph.
D. E. The sheriff or his designated agent shall collect the wages of any
employed inmate, so employed shall be collected by the sheriff or by his designated
agent, and the sheriff shall deposit the same wages in a public banking institution,
and keep a ledger showing the financial status of each inmate on in the program.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-891 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 458
E. The wages F. The sheriff shall disburse the wages of any such inmate
shall be disbursed by the sheriff for the following purposes and in the order stated
who participates in a work release program in the following order:
(1) The board of the inmate including food, clothing, medical, and dental
expenses An assessment for room and board, not to exceed thirty-three percent of the
inmate's gross wages.
(2) Necessary travel expense expenses to and from work and other incidental
expenses of the inmate expenses related to documented employment.
(3) Support of the inmate's dependents, if any applicable.
(4) Payment, either in full or ratably of the inmate's obligations
acknowledged by him in writing, or which have been reduced to judgment of any
court ordered-restitution or legally recognized obligations.
(5) The balance, if any, to the inmate upon his discharge The remaining
balance, payable directly to the inmate on a regular basis, and not subject to any
withholding except as provided in this Section.
G. After receiving the disbursements provided in Subsection F of this
Section, the inmate shall retain the remaining portion of his earned wages. No
additional per diem, administrative fee, or supplemental housing charge shall be
assessed beyond the total amount provided in Paragraph (D)(2) of this Section.
F. H. The wages of an employee inmate so employed shall be not be less
than the customary wages for an employee performing similar services.
G. I.(1) Any inmate who has been convicted of forcible or second degree
rape (R.S. 14:42.1), aggravated arson (R.S. 14:51), armed robbery (R.S. 14:64),
attempted murder (R.S. 14:27 and 29), attempted armed robbery (R.S. 14:27 and 64),
and persons sentenced as habitual offenders under R.S. 15:529.1 shall be eligible to
participate in a work release program during the last six months of their terms.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section and unless the inmate is eligible at an
earlier date, those inmates who have served a minimum of fifteen years in the
custody of the department or the sheriff for those crimes enumerated in this Section,
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-891 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 458
shall be eligible to participate in a work release program during the last twelve
months of their term terms.
(2) Any inmate convicted of producing, manufacturing, distributing, or
dispensing, or possession with intent to produce, manufacture, distribute, or dispense
a controlled dangerous substance classified in R.S. 40:964 shall be eligible to
participate in the work release program if the inmate is otherwise in compliance with
the standards for work release.
H. J. No inmate employed in the work release program shall be employed
in a position which would necessitate his departure from the state except for those
inmates assigned to work release programs who are employed in industries off the
coast of Louisiana.